Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1460HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 847 Section 1. Section 455B.104, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. By December 31 of each year, the department shall submit 3 a report to the governor and the general assembly regarding 4 the greenhouse gas emissions in the state during the previous 5 calendar year and forecasting trends in such emissions that 6 occurred during the two calendar years prior to the current 7 calendar year . The first submission by the department shall 8 be filed by December 31, 2011, for the calendar year beginning 9 January 1, 2010. If completed, the publication of an annual 10 statewide greenhouse gas inventory for the state by the United 11 States environmental protection agency shall satisfy this 12 requirement. 13 Sec. 2. Section 455B.133B, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 14 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 a. The air emission fee account shall include all fees 16 established by the commission to be imposed and collected by 17 the department for emission fees for regulated pollutants 18 submitted by major sources as defined in section 502 of the 19 federal Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Â§7661, and 20 as defined in 567 IAC ch. 22 by the commission by rule pursuant 21 to section 455B.133 . 22 Sec. 3. Section 455B.133B, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 23 2025, is amended to read as follows: 24 a. The operating permit application fee account shall 25 include all fees established by the commission to be imposed 26 and collected by the department for accepting applications 27 for operating permits submitted by major sources as defined 28 in section 502 of the federal Clean Air Act Amendments of 29 1990, 42 U.S.C. Â§7661, and as defined in 567 IAC ch. 22 by the 30 commission by rule pursuant to section 455B.133 . 31 Sec. 4. Section 455B.304, subsection 12, Code 2025, is 32 amended by striking the subsection. 33 Sec. 5. REPEAL. Section 455B.152, Code 2025, is repealed. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 1460HV (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. 847 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to duties of the department of natural 3 resources (DNR) related to air quality. 4 Under current law, DNR is required to submit a report to the 5 governor and general assembly yearly by December 31 regarding 6 greenhouse gas emissions in the state during the previous 7 calendar year. Pursuant to the Consolidated Appropriations 8 Act of 2008, the United States environmental protection agency 9 (EPA) has started conducting annual statewide greenhouse gas 10 inventories. These inventories cover the year prior to the 11 previous year. The bill changes the time frame covered by the 12 report to include emissions that occurred two calendar years 13 prior to the current calendar year to align with EPAâs schedule 14 and allows the EPA inventory, if completed, to fulfill the 15 reporting requirement. 16 As a result of administrative code realignment, rules 17 relating to emission fees and operating permits previously in 18 567 IAC ch. 22 were moved to 567 IAC ch. 24. The bill removes 19 specified rule references to conform to the Iowa administrative 20 code change. 21 The bill removes a provision requiring the environmental 22 protection commission to adopt rules for the certification of 23 solid waste incinerator operators. 24 Under current law, DNR is required to create a greenhouse 25 gas inventory by gathering data and reporting information from 26 producers of greenhouse gases regarding their emissions and 27 coordinate this data collection with EPA. Additionally, DNR is 28 required to establish a voluntary greenhouse gas registry. The 29 bill repeals these requirements. Federal regulations provide 30 requirements for greenhouse gas reporting and a voluntary 31 greenhouse gas registry. 32 -2- LSB 1460HV (1) 91 sb/js 2/ 2